Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.08
Hospital, defined.

Hospital has the same meaning as in section 71-419.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5816;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 115.